Utah statutes.
48-2a-205.   Execution by judicial act.

If a person required by Section 48-2a-204 to execute any certificate fails or refuses to do so, any other person who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal may petition a district court having competent jurisdiction to direct the execution of the certificate.  If the court finds that it is proper for the certificate to be executed and that any person so designated has failed or refused to execute the certificate, it shall order the division to record an appropriate certificate.

